Louisiana, session 2026, HB415.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:1420.31 is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1420.31. Local government officials; training; certain municipalities
A. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, all mayors
shall, and members of the governing authorities of municipalities with a population
of fifteen thousand persons or less according the latest federal decennial census may,
participate in workshops and other training courses offered by state agencies,
associations, or groups that provide training to local government officials, which are
intended to assist such officials in carrying out their duties by enhancing their
knowledge of laws regulating their respective municipalities. Any such elected
official may use any local government resource provided by such associations or
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-411 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 415
groups to the officials and their respective municipalities and make such resources
available to administrative staff members.
B. Any state agency, association, or group provided for in Subsection A of
this Section may work jointly to provide workshops, training courses, and other
resources to the elected officials and may offer incentives to the officials, such as
continuing education credits or certificates for specialization in certain subject
matters, to encourage their use of resources and attendance at workshops and training
courses.
C. All mayors shall earn not less than sixteen hours of credit annually
through their attendance at workshops and other training courses offered by state
agencies, associations, or groups as provided in this Section.
D. The training requirement provided for in Subsection C of this Section
shall include any training that is required by state law, including the following:
(1) Ethics training pursuant to R.S. 42:1170.
(2) Sexual harassment prevention training pursuant to R.S. 42:343.
(3) Cybersecurity training pursuant to R.S. 42:1267.
(4) Campaign finance training pursuant to R.S. 42:1170.
(5) Training on procurement and letting of public contracts pursuant to R.S.
33:1420.32.
(6) Emergency preparedness training pursuant to R.S. 29:726(F)(2).
E. The training courses offered to elected officials pursuant to Subsection C
of this Section shall be established, at a minimum, within the following categories
of municipal governance:
(1) The Lawrason Act and municipal authority.
(2) The roles and responsibilities of mayors and municipal councils.
(3) Public budgeting, finance, audits, and procurement laws.
(4) Ethics and conflicts of interest.
(5) Human resources, personnel management, and civil service.
(6) Open Meetings Law and Public Records Law.
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-411 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 415
(7) Public safety, emergency preparedness, and police and fire operations.
(8) Utility operations and infrastructure management.
(9) Planning, zoning, annexation, and land use.
(10) Economic development and community engagement.
(11) Robert's Rules of Order and parliamentary procedure.
(12) Municipal best practices and compliance.
(13) Tax codes, revenue authority, and financial administration.
F.(1) On or before January thirty-first of each year, each mayor shall provide
a report concerning compliance with the training requirements provided for in this
Section to the Louisiana Municipal Association.
(2) On or before March thirty-first of each year, the Louisiana Municipal
Association shall determine whether each mayor has satisfied the training and
continuing education requirements of this Section for the preceding calendar year.
(3) Upon making the determination required by Paragraph (2) of this
Subsection, the Louisiana Municipal Association shall certify each mayor as either
compliant or noncompliant.
(4) The Louisiana Municipal Association shall ensure that each mayor is
notified of the training required by this Section. The Louisiana Municipal
Association shall be responsible for maintaining records of the compliance of each
mayor with the mandatory training requirements. Each mayor's record of
compliance shall be a public record and available to the public in accordance with
the Public Records Law.
C. G. The provisions of this Part are applicable to any person who is
appointed temporarily to fill a vacancy in an elective office of any municipality
provided for in Subsection A of this Section.
Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall apply to all mayors elected on or after
January 1, 2027.
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-411 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 415